Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
There is appropriated to the Department of Justice, for  the biennium be-
ginning July 1, 2019, out of the General Fund, the amount of $12,945,651 for the payment of
expenses of district attorneys.
SECTION 2.
This 2019 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency  is declared to exist, and this 2019 Act takes effect
July 1, 2019.
Passed by House June 24, 2019
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate June 29, 2019
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2019
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2019
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2019
..................................................................................
Bev Clarno, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 5014 (HB 5014-A) Page 1